Utah statutes.
19-6-606.   Enforcement.

(1)  The director may authorize inspections under Section 19-6-107 of any place, building, or premise where lead acid batteries are sold to determine compliance with this part.  The director may authorize inspections under this subsection only as funding is available within the department's current budget.

(2)  Local health departments established under Title 26A, Local Health Authorities, may enforce the provisions of this part.

